src-fst-morphology-stems-exceptions.lexc.md
Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

the verbs of negation have partial inflection:
* *äʼb:* `äb+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *iʼzt:* `äb+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl2`
* *iʼzt:* `äb+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3`
* *aʼlgid:* `äb+V+Aux+Neg+Imprt+Pl2`

Some verbs only have few word-forms left:
* *piḑīm:*
* *piḑīks:*

The verb lǟdõ has irregular forms:
* *lekš:*
* *li:*

The verb vȱlda has irregular forms:
* *uʼm:*
* *ūo:*

### PRONOUNS

### PROPER NOUNS

### NOUNS partitive for morfa demo

### NUMERALS testing

### testing what is this

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-liv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc)</small>
